New Jersey, session 222, A407.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    A school district shall incorporate instruction on cursive handwriting into the curriculum for students in grades kindergarten through five. The curriculum shall include activities and instructional materials that help students become proficient in reading cursive and writing in cursive legibly by the end of grade three. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall first apply to the first full school year next following the date of enactment.